HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
аксіоматизувати/AB
ампліфікуватися/B
армувати/AB
багритися/B
баритися/BF
більшовизувати/ABGH
боронити/ABEFGH
будувати/ABGH
валити/ABEFGH
ввезти/AB
вгамовувати/AB
вдарити/ABCD
веляризувати/ABGH
вживити/AB
вибріхувати/AB
вивільнити/ABEF
вигартовувати/AB
вигойдувати/AB
вигребти/AB
видозмінювати/AB
визискувати/AB
википіти/AB
виконувати/ABGH
викривлювати/ABGH
викушувати/AB
вилуджувати/AB
вимелювати/AB
вимощувати/AB
випарити/AB
випльовувати/ABGHOP
випрасовувати/AB
вип'ясти/AB
вироблювати/AB
висвітити/AB
висловити/ABEF
висолопити/AB
виструнчити/AB
витискувати/AB
витравити/ABEF
вихвалити/AB
вихоплювати/AB
вичистити/ABEF
вищербити/AB
відбудувати/AB
відволожуватися/B
відгребти/AB
віджартуватися/B
відіспатися/B
відкоригувати/AB
відлежати/AB
відмежувати/AB
відновлювати/ABGH
відпоїти/AB
відпупковуватися/B
відроїтися/B
відскакувати/AB
відстоювати/ABGH
відтушовувати/AB
відціджуватися/B
відшкребти/AB
вклинити/ABCD
вкрадатися/B
вмішувати/AB
возвеличувати/AB
вояжувати/AB
впокорювати/AB
врізати/ABIJGH
всовувати/AB
втеплювати/AB
вточити/AB
вулканізувати/AB
гайнуватися/B
гарячитися/BH
гіпертрофувати/AB
годитися/BH
гороїжитися/B
гребти/ABGH
гуртувати/ABGH
дегенерувати/AB
делегувати/ABGH
денервувати/ABGH
дешифрувати/AB
дискутувати/ABGH
добалакуватися/B
договорити/ABEF
доклеюватися/B
домелюватися/B
допарубкуватися/B
дороблюватися/B
достригти/AB
доховуватися/B
евакуйовувати/AB
жахнути/ABEF
забаламучувати/AB
заброджувати/AB
завищувати/ABGH
завощити/AB
загарпунити/AB
заговоритися/B
задавнитися/B
заземлювати/AB
заквашувати/AB
закопилитися/B
зактивізувати/AB
заліснювати/AB
замахнути/ABEF
замочити/AEBF
занумерувати/AB
запечалити/AB
запозичуватися/B
запрошувати/ABGH
зарятувати/AB
заслонювати/AB
заспокоювати/AB
засупонювати/AB
затопити/ABEF
зафарбовувати/AB
зацукровуватися/B
заштопувати/AB
збіднити/AB
звідуватися/B
згодовувати/AB
здзвонитися/BF
зірвати/AB
злущувати/ABGH
змогтися/B
знегазувати/AB
зніжувати/AB
зримувати/AB
зцідити/AB
індивідуалізувати/AB
казитися/B
кільчитися/B
комбінувати/AB
концертувати/AB
криміналізувати/ABGH
лапнути/AB
ловити/ABEFGH
маритися/B
мілітаризувати/ABGH
мотнути/ABEF
навалити/ABEF
нагноїтися/B
надломити/AB
наймитувати/AB
налагоджувати/ABGH
намішувати/AB
наплодити/ABEF
народжувати/ABGH
насолодити/AB
натомити/AB
націоналізувати/AB
недооцінювати/AB
нормалізовуватися/BH
обгидити/AB
обкапувати/ABGH
облущувати/AB
обмуровувати/AB
обрізати/ABGH
обтесати/AB
оголошувати/ABGH
оздоблювати/AB
окурюватися/B
опоряджувати/AB
освідчувати/AB
осоромити/AB
охазяйнуватися/B
пантрувати/AB
переборюватися/B
перевпорядкувати/AB
передержувати/AB
переказитися/B
перекрутити/ABEF
перемкнути/ABEF
переозначувати/AB
переполошитися/B
переродити/ABEF
перестелити/ABEF
переустатковувати/AB
перчити/AB
підготувати/AB
підкреслити/ABEF
підмінювати/AB
підрегулювати/AB
підстелити/ABEF
підштовхнути/ABEF
побенкетувати/AB
повідв'язувати/AB
поглинути/ABCD
подружити/AB
позасвічуватися/B
позувати/ABGH
покрутити/ABEF
помалювати/AB
понадламувати/AB
поняньчити/AB
попіарити/AB
попрямувати/AB
пороти/AB
послуговуватися/BH
потаїтися/B
потрусити/ABEF
почистити/ABEF
прибіднюватися/B
приглянути/AB
признавати/AB
приліплювати/AB
приохочувати/AB
приростити/AB
присуджувати/ABGH
прихистити/AB
проаналізувати/AB
прогризтися/B
проінструктувати/AB
прологарифмувати/AB
пропарювати/AB
просиджувати/AB
простромитися/B
профільтрувати/AB
пудлінгуватися/B
регламентувати/ABGH
ретушувати/AB
розбомбити/ABEF
розв'язувати/ABGH
роздивитися/BF
роззявити/ABCD
розкричати/AB
розлягтися/B
розніжитися/B
розплавити/ABCD
розпростувати/AB
розсіктися/B
розтоптатися/B
розцвічуватися/B
розштовхнути/ABEF
самовдосконалюватися/B
свердлитися/B
сіпнути/ABEF
сколотити/AB
скоювати/AB
сльозити/AB
спаскуджуватися/B
спльовувати/AB
спорядити/AB
спустити/ABEF
стишити/AB
строщити/AB
супроводити/ABGH
талуватися/B
титулувати/AB
транслітерувати/ABGH
тупити/ABEF
увірити/AB
удосконалювати/ABGH
укоротити/ABEF
уможливлювати/AB
упізнавати/ABGH
урезонювати/AB
усовувати/AB
уткнути/ABEF
учинити/ABEF
філософствувати/AB
хлюпотатися/B
цупити/AB
шепотати/ABGH
щенитися/BH
